Nevada, session 83, SB82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 223 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in
sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them
in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Director” means the Director of the Office of Early
Childhood Services.
Sec. 4. “Early childhood services” means programs and
services that support the development and education of children
from birth to 5 years of age.
Sec. 5. “Office” means the Office of Early Childhood
Services.
Sec. 6. 1. The Office of Early Childhood Services is hereby
created in the Office of the Governor.
2. The Governor shall appoint a Director of the Office of
Early Childhood Services. The Director is in the unclassified
service of the State and serves at the pleasure of the Governor.
3. The Director shall advise the Governor on all matters
relating to the formulation and implementation of policies,
programs and procedures affecting early childhood services in this
State.
4. The Director may apply for any available grants and
accept any gifts, grants or donations for the support of the Office
and its activities pursuant to sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this act.
5. The Director shall not engage in any other gainful
employment or occupation.
Sec. 7. 1. The Office of Early Childhood Services shall:
(a) Analyze whether the existing early childhood services meet
the needs of children and families in this State;
-
*SB82*

– 3 –
(b) Identify and make recommendations to the Governor
relating to improving early childhood services in this State;
(c) Identify the amount of funding necessary to provide an
optimal level of early childhood services in this State; and
(d) Identify opportunities to obtain federal money to support
existing and create additional early childhood services in this
State, including, without limitation, funding for workforce
development in early childhood services.
2. Each agency, board, commission, department, officer,
employee or agent of this State or a local government of this State
shall provide to the Office or any representative of the Office such
assistance as the functions and operations of the Office may
require if that assistance is within the scope of duties of the person
or entity.
Sec. 8. 1. On or before December 1 of each year, the
Director of the Office of Early Childhood Services shall submit a
report concerning early childhood services to the Governor and to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the Legislature or, if the Legislature is not in session, to the
Legislative Commission.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Any recommendations for improving early childhood
services in this State, including, without limitation,
recommendations for creating or expanding early child services;
(b) The amount of money the State provides for early
childhood services and a description of how such state money is
used;
(c) The amount of federal money that the State receives for
early childhood services and a description of how such federal
money is used; and
(d) A description of any opportunity for obtaining additional
federal money for early childhood services in this State, including,
without limitation, the amount of matching funds that may be
required for obtaining additional federal money.
Sec. 9. NRS 223.085 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.085 1. The Governor may, within the limits of available
money, employ such persons as he or she deems necessary to
provide an appropriate staff for the Office of the Governor,
including, without limitation, the Office of Economic Development,
the Office of Federal Assistance, the Office of Science, Innovation
and Technology, the Public Health Resource Office , the Office of
Early Childhood Services and the Governor’s mansion. Except as
otherwise provided by specific statute, such employees are not in the
classified or unclassified service of the State and, except as
-
*SB82*

– 4 –
otherwise provided in NRS 231.043 and 231.047, serve at the
pleasure of the Governor. Such staff and employees include, without
limitation:
(a) Executive staff;
(b) Administrative and clerical staff;
(c) Outreach and communications staff;
(d) Research and analytical staff; and
(e) Any other persons the Governor determines are necessary to
effectively fulfill the duties, responsibilities and obligations of the
Office of the Governor.
2. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute, the
Governor shall:
(a) Determine the salaries and benefits of the persons employed
pursuant to subsection 1, within limits of money available for that
purpose; and
(b) Adopt such rules and policies as he or she deems appropriate
to establish the duties and employment rights of the persons
employed pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Governor shall appoint a Chief Information Officer of
the State who is responsible for:
(a) Information technology leadership and accountability;
(b) Strategic planning for information technology;
(c) Information technology workforce for the State;
(d) Budgeting and planning for information technology for the
State;
(e) Data storage and integrity;
(f) Investment management for information technology;
(g) Information technology security, cyber security and privacy;
and
(h) Any other duties or responsibilities prescribed by statute or
regulation.
4. The Governor shall appoint a Chief Innovation Officer of
the State who is responsible for:
(a) Providing overall leadership and guidance relating to
employee acquisition, career development, succession planning,
retention, professional development and training, leadership
development, compensation and benefits;
(b) Developing human resource plans and strategies
prospectively by at least 10 years;
(c) Reviewing and monitoring the efficiency of the State
Government and providing recommendations on how to reduce
costs, improve the delivery of services and ensure the cost-
effectiveness of all state governmental programs;
-
*SB82*

– 5 –
(d) Evaluating, overseeing and administering the
competitiveness, appropriateness and effectiveness of the wages,
salaries, benefits and work environment of public employees;
(e) Evaluating, overseeing and administering the training and
readiness programs for public employees; and
(f) Developing comprehensive and strategic recruitment and
retention plans to meet the human resource needs of the State.
Sec. 10. 1. The Office of Early Childhood Services shall
conduct a study concerning early childhood services in this State
during the 2025-2026 interim. The study must include, without
limitation:
(a) Any recommendations for improving early childhood
services in this State, including, without limitation,
recommendations for creating or expanding early child services;
(b) The amount of money the State provides for early childhood
services and a description of how such money is used;
(c) The amount of federal money that the State receives for early
childhood services and a description of how such federal money is
used;
(d) A description of any opportunity for obtaining additional
federal money for early childhood services, including, without
limitation, the amount of matching funds that may be required for
obtaining additional federal money; and
(e) Any recommendation for the development of a
comprehensive data system relating to early childhood services in
this State.
2. In conducting the study required pursuant to subsection 1,
the Office may consult with and receive input from state agencies,
local governments, nonprofit organizations and stakeholders with
expertise in early childhood services.
3. On or before January 1, 2027, the Office of Early Childhood
Services shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations
to the Governor and to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the 84th Session of the Legislature.
Sec. 11. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 12. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective upon
passage and approval for the purpose of performing any preparatory
administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of
this act, and on July 1, 2025, for all other purposes, and expire by
limitation on June 30, 2027.
-
*SB82*

– 6 –
3. Sections 10 and 11 of this act become effective on July 1,
2025.
H
-
*SB82*